Massachusetts, session 194th, S2413.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 11 of chapter 89 General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking, in line 17, the figure “$200” and inserting in place thereof the figure
“$500 for the first offense, and $1,000 for the second offense”.
of 1